Hawaii statutes.
§457-3 State board of nursing; appointment;
term of office. The board shall consist of nine members as follows:

(1) Six shall be registered nurses, one of whom shall
be licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse in this State;

(2) One shall be a licensed practical nurse; and

(3) Two shall be public members.

Both nursing education and
direct providers of nursing services shall be represented on the board. The
term of office for members of the board shall be four years. No member shall
be appointed to more than two consecutive terms or serve more than eight
consecutive years. Six members of the board shall be residents of the city and
county of Honolulu and three shall be residents of counties other than the city
and county of Honolulu. [L 1970, c 71, pt of §1; am L 1978, c 208, §7;
am L 1992, c 202, §106; am L 1994, c 277, §5; am L 2000, c 61, §1; am L 2014, c
46, §4; am L 2016, c 8, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next